District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.04

Liability of members and managers.

(a)

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited cooperative association. A member or manager of the limited cooperative association is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the association solely by reason of being or acting as a member or manager of the association. This subsection applies regardless of the dissolution of the association.

(b)

The failure of a limited cooperative association to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on any member or manager of the association for any debt, obligation, or other liability of the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(4)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 504 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.